Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5660.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "MI home program act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Condominium project" means that term as defined in section 4 of the condominium act, 1978 PA 59, MCL 559.104. (b) "Employee" means that term as defined in section 8 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.8. (c) "Employer" means that term as defined in section 8 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.8. (d) "Household income" means that term as defined in section 2 of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2652. (e) "Income-qualified household" means that term as defined in section 2 of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2652. (f) "Inflation rate" means that term as defined in and determined under section 34d of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.34d. (g) "Land bank fast track authority" means an authority created under the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774. (h) "Local unit of government" means a county, city, village, or township. (i) "Long-term housing" means a term of not less than 30 consecutive days. Sec. 3a. As used in this act: (a) "MI home community" means a local unit of government that has received certification as a MI home community under section 7. (b) "MI home employer fund" means the MI home employer fund created in section 21. (c) "MI home employer program" means the MI home employer program created under section 19. (d) "MI home grant fund" means the MI home grant fund created in section 13. (e) "MI home grant program" means the MI home grant program created under section 11. (f) "MI home loan fund" means the MI home loan fund created in section 17. (g) "MI home loan program" means the MI home loan program created under section 15. (h) "MI home readiness fund" means the MI home readiness fund created in section 9. (i) "MI home readiness program" means the MI home readiness program created under section 5. (j) "Michigan state housing development authority" or "MSHDA" means the Michigan state housing development authority created in section 21 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1421. (k) "Mixed-use" means that term as defined in section 2 of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2652. (l) "Modular home" means a home constructed in panels or sections off-site with final assembly happening on-site and meeting the same standards of the Michigan residential code or Michigan building code, as promulgated under the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1501 to 125.1531, that would be applied to a site-built house. Sec. 3b. As used in this act: (a) "Qualified applicant" means any of the following, but does not include a housing development organization that develops or manages real estate: (i) A land bank fast track authority. (ii) A local unit of government. (iii) A for-profit corporation or other business entity incorporated or organized in this state or incorporated under the laws of another state and qualified to do business in this state. (iv) A nonprofit corporation incorporated under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 4501.3192, or incorporated under the laws of another state and qualified to do business in this state. (b) "Qualified developer" means any of the following: (i) A nonprofit corporation incorporated under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 4501.3192, or incorporated under the laws of another state and qualified to do business in this state, with a primary mission of developing and preserving attainable housing. (ii) A real estate developer that constructs or rehabilitates, or proposes to construct or rehabilitate, qualifying residential property. (iii) A land bank fast track authority. (iv) A qualified individual who purchases a qualified residential property to rehabilitate the property for use as the qualified individual's primary residence. (c) "Qualified individual" means an individual who meets both of the following requirements: (i) Is, or is a member of, an income-qualified household. (ii) Demonstrates the financial means to purchase or rent the qualified residential property. (d) "Qualified residential property" means residential property that is either of the following: (i) Sold, on a permanent basis, to a qualified individual. Property purchased by a qualified developer described in subdivision (b)(iv) is considered sold to a qualified individual for purposes of this subparagraph. (ii) Rented to a qualified individual at a monthly rate, including any fees, that does not exceed 30% of the monthly income of the qualified individual. If rented, the property must be rented on a year-round basis. (e) "Qualified workforce housing development project" means a project that meets all of the following requirements: (i) The project will newly construct or substantially rehabilitate, or both, qualified residential property. (ii) Each dwelling unit that is part of the project will meet both of the following requirements: (A) Be placed on a permanent foundation. (B) Have electrical, heating and cooling, plumbing, bathing and restroom facilities, a kitchen, and sleeping spaces. (f) "Qualified zoning changes" means changes to land use policies, zoning ordinances, master plans, or permitting processes, or similar changes, to encourage increased housing supply and affordability, including changes to do any of the following: (i) Eliminate or reduce parking requirements so not more than 1.5 parking spaces are required per dwelling unit. (ii) Allow any of the following as a residential use of property for the purposes of zoning and a permitted use in a majority of residentially zoned districts without requiring a special use permit or procedure: (A) Duplexes. (B) Accessory dwelling units for use as long-term housing. (C) Occupancy of a single room by an unrelated individual for use as long-term housing. (D) Modular homes. (iii) Allow property near transit and employment centers to have a higher maximum residential density than property elsewhere. (iv) Eliminate or reduce minimum dwelling unit size requirements to 800 square feet or less of floor area. (v) Allow mixed-use development that includes a residential use in areas zoned commercial. (vi) Eliminate or reduce minimum lot size requirements to 5,000 square feet or less in residentially zoned districts. (vii) Provide height or density bonuses. (viii) Adopt universal design standards for residential construction. (ix) Expand or expedite administrative review approvals. (x) Adopt preapproved building plans or a preapproved building program. (xi) Complete the redevelopment ready communities program. (g) "Redevelopment ready communities program" means the redevelopment ready communities program operated by the Michigan economic development corporation. (h) "Rental restrictions" means both of the following requirements related to the rental of qualified residential property: (i) For a period of not less than 10 years following the completion of the construction or rehabilitation, the qualified residential property must be rented to a qualified individual. (ii) A qualified individual who rents the qualified residential property must occupy the qualified residential property as a primary residence for the duration of the lease. (i) "Residential property" includes all of the following, regardless of whether the property is owner-occupied or rental property: (i) A single-family dwelling, including, but not limited to, a stand-alone house, townhouse, row house, or modular home. (ii) A 1- to 4-family house with separate dwelling units, including, but not limited to, a duplex, triplex, or quadplex, or 1 or more dwelling units within a 1- to 4-family house. (iii) 1 or more dwelling units in a condominium project. (iv) 1 or more dwelling units in a mixed-use structure. (j) "Sale restrictions" means all of the following requirements related to the sale of qualified residential property: (i) The qualified residential property must be sold to a qualified individual. (ii) For a period of not less than 5 years after the date of purchase, the qualified individual must maintain ownership of the qualified residential property, occupy the qualified residential property as a primary residence, and not rent any portion of the property for a term of not less than 30 consecutive days. (iii) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, for a period of 10 years following the date of purchase, the qualified individual may not sell the property to any purchaser other than a qualified individual. MSHDA may waive this sales restriction after year 5 of the 10-year period. (k) "Substantially rehabilitate" means the rehabilitation of a dwelling unit that requires a financial investment of not less than $25,000.00. (l) "Workforce down payment assistance" means financial assistance provided to a qualified individual to make a down payment on, and cover costs associated with, purchasing a dwelling unit. Sec. 5. (1) The Michigan state housing development authority shall create and operate the MI home readiness program to provide grants to local units of government to cover costs associated with the adoption of land use policies, master plan updates, zoning text amendments, and similar actions to encourage increasing housing supply and affordability. (2) MSHDA shall develop a detailed application, approval, and compliance process for the MI home readiness program that is published and available on its website. The detailed application, approval, and compliance process must, at a minimum, provide for all of the following: (a) A local unit of government may apply to MSHDA for a grant to pay for the costs associated with the adoption of land use policies, master plan updates, zoning text amendments, and similar actions to encourage increasing housing supply and affordability. (b) The application must require the applicant to provide a description of the proposed activities for which costs will be covered by the grant under subdivision (a). (c) MSHDA shall award grants on a first-come, first-served basis. (d) The amount of the grant must not exceed $50,000.00. (e) The grant must be disbursed in 2 installments. MSHDA shall disburse the first installment on execution of a written agreement under subsection (3). MSHDA shall disburse the second installment on completion of the proposed activities. (f) A local unit of government must use the grant money only to pay for the costs associated with the adoption of land use policies, master plan updates, zoning text amendments, and similar actions to encourage increasing housing supply and affordability. These costs may include work performed by contracted employees or third-party consultants. Grant money may not be used for indirect rates or grant administration. MSDHA may audit the local unit of government to ensure that grant money is used for allowable costs, and the local unit of government must provide any information reasonably requested by MSHDA. The local unit of government must repay any grant money that is used for costs other than costs allowed under this subdivision. (g) On completion of the proposed activities, the local unit of government shall provide a summary of the completed activities to MSHDA. (h) A local unit of government that receives a grant must complete the proposed activities not later than 2 years after the date the written agreement is executed under subsection (3). If the local unit of government does not complete the proposed activities within 2 years, the local unit of government shall not receive the second installment of the grant award. (i) Money that is not disbursed under subdivision (h) or that is repaid to this state under subdivision (f) must be deposited in the MI home readiness fund. (3) If MSHDA approves an application, MSHDA shall enter into a written agreement with the local unit of government that includes the terms of the grant, including the requirements described in subsection (2). Sec. 7. (1) A local unit of government may apply to MSHDA, in the form and manner prescribed by MSHDA, for certification as a MI home community. (2) MSHDA shall grant certification under subsection (1) if MSHDA determines that the local unit of government has made at least 50% of the qualified zoning changes described in section 3b(f)(i) to (xi). (3) MSHDA shall maintain a list of all local units of government certified as MI home communities and make that list available to the public on its website. (4) MSHDA shall develop a statewide matchmaking platform to identify housing opportunities and enable connections between this state, MI home communities, and developers. Sec. 9. (1) The MI home readiness fund is created as a separate fund under the jurisdiction and control of the Michigan state housing development authority. (2) Money and other assets received under subsection (6) or section 5(2)(i) or from any other source must be deposited in the MI home readiness fund. MSHDA shall direct the investment of money in the MI home readiness fund in accordance with section 22 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422, and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the MI home readiness fund. (3) Money in the MI home readiness fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the MI home readiness fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) MSHDA is the administrator of the MI home readiness fund for audits of the MI home readiness fund. (5) MSHDA shall expend money from the MI home readiness fund on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Provision of grants to local units of government under the MI home readiness program. (b) Administration of the MI home readiness program. (c) Creation and maintenance of the statewide matchmaking platform described in section 7. (6) For the first 5 fiscal years after the effective date of this act, the legislature shall appropriate $5,000,000.00 each fiscal year for deposit into the MI home readiness fund. Sec. 11. (1) The Michigan state housing development authority shall create the MI home grant program to provide grants to qualified developers to pay for the cost of constructing or rehabilitating qualified residential property in a MI home community. (2) MSHDA shall develop a detailed application, approval, and compliance process for the MI home grant program that is published and available on its website. The detailed application, approval, and compliance process must, at a minimum, provide for all of the following: (a) A qualified developer may apply to MSHDA for a grant to newly construct or substantially rehabilitate 1 or more qualified residential properties located in a MI home community. (b) The amount of the grant must not exceed the following: (i) For new construction, 1/3 of the cost of construction or $100,000.00 per dwelling unit, whichever is less. On March 1 of each year, the dollar amount under this subparagraph must be adjusted by multiplying the dollar amount for the immediately preceding year by the inflation rate. (ii) For rehabilitation of existing property, 1/3 of the cost of rehabilitation or $50,000.00 per dwelling unit, whichever is less. On March 1 of each year, the dollar amount under this subparagraph must be adjusted by multiplying the dollar amount for the immediately preceding year by the inflation rate. (c) The application must require the applicant to provide the standard information described in section 23 and be accompanied by the standard documents described in section 23. (d) The qualified developer must use the grant money only for the purpose of constructing or rehabilitating the qualified residential property. (e) The qualified developer must agree to sell or rent the qualified residential property to a qualified individual in accordance with the sale restrictions or rental restrictions, as applicable. (f) The sale restrictions or rental restrictions must be included in the purchase agreement or lease, as applicable, and included in the property deed as deed restrictions. (g) The grant must not be disbursed until a written agreement under subsection (3) is executed and the sale restrictions or rental restrictions are included in the property deed as deed restrictions. (h) The purchase agreement or lease, as applicable, must include both of the following provisions: (i) A provision requiring the qualified individual to comply with the reporting requirements under this act. (ii) A provision that the qualified individual will be subject to the penalties provided in section 31 if the sale restrictions or rental restrictions are violated. (i) A qualified developer must comply with the reporting requirements described in this act. (j) A qualified developer that violates a provision of this act is subject to the penalties provided in section 31. (k) Payments of penalties must be deposited in the MI home grant fund. (3) If MSHDA approves an application, MSHDA shall enter into a written agreement with the qualified developer that includes the terms of the grant, including the requirements described in subsection (2). (4) In determining whether to approve a grant under this section, MSHDA must consider all of the following factors: (a) The capacity of the qualified developer to complete the project. (b) The housing needs of the community and the extent to which the project will address those housing needs. (c) Local support for the project. Sec. 13. (1) The MI home grant fund is created as a separate fund under the jurisdiction and control of the Michigan state housing development housing authority. (2) Money and other assets received under subsection (6) or (7) or section 11(2)(k) or from any other source must be deposited in the MI home grant fund. MSHDA shall direct the investment of money in the MI home grant fund in accordance with section 22 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422, and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the MI home grant fund. (3) Money in the MI home grant fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the MI home grant fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) MSHDA is the administrator of the MI home grant fund for audits of the MI home grant fund. (5) MSHDA shall expend money from the MI home grant fund on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Provision of grants to qualified developers under the MI home grant program. (b) Administration of the MI home grant program. (6) For the first 2 fiscal years after the effective date of this act, the legislature shall appropriate $95,000,000.00 each fiscal year for deposit into the MI home grant fund. (7) For the next 3 fiscal years after the fiscal years described in subsection (6), the legislature shall appropriate $145,000,000.00 each fiscal year for deposit into the MI home grant fund. Sec. 15. (1) The Michigan state housing development authority shall create the MI home loan program to address financing gaps for constructing or rehabilitating qualified residential property in a MI home community. (2) MSHDA shall develop a detailed application, approval, and compliance process for the MI home loan program that is published and available on its website. The detailed application, approval, and compliance process must, at a minimum, provide for all of the following: (a) A qualified developer may apply to MSHDA for a loan to newly construct or substantially rehabilitate 1 or more qualified residential properties located in a MI home community. (b) The amount of the loan must not exceed the amount necessary to cover financing gaps associated with the construction and development of the qualified residential property. (c) The loan must bear interest at a rate determined by MSHDA. (d) The application must require the applicant to provide the standard information described in section 23 and be accompanied by the standard documents described in section 23. In addition, the application must require the applicant to provide a description of the financing gap that the loan is intended to address. (e) The qualified developer must use the financing only for the purpose of constructing or rehabilitating the qualified residential property. (f) The qualified developer must agree to sell or rent the qualified residential property to a qualified individual in accordance with the sale restrictions or rental restrictions, as applicable. (g) The sale restrictions or rental restrictions must be included in the purchase agreement or lease, as applicable, and included in the property deed as deed restrictions. (h) The financing must not be disbursed until a written agreement under subsection (3) is executed and the sale restrictions or rental restrictions are included in the property deed as deed restrictions. (i) The purchase agreement or lease, as applicable, must include both of the following provisions: (i) A provision requiring the qualified individual to comply with the reporting requirements under this act. (ii) A provision that the qualified individual will be subject to the penalties provided in section 31 if the sale restrictions or rental restrictions are violated. (j) A qualified developer must comply with the reporting requirements described in this act. (k) A qualified developer that violates a provision of this act is subject to the penalties provided in section 31. (l) Payments of principal, interest, and penalties must be deposited in the MI home loan fund. (3) If MSHDA approves an application, MSHDA shall enter into a written agreement with the qualified developer that includes the terms of the financing, including the requirements described in subsection (2). (4) In determining whether to approve financing under this section, MSHDA must consider all of the following factors: (a) The capacity of the qualified developer to complete the project. (b) The housing needs of the community and the extent to which the project will address those housing needs. (c) Local support for the project. (d) Whether the loan will address a financing gap. Sec. 17. (1) The MI home loan fund is created as a separate fund under the jurisdiction and control of the Michigan state housing development authority. (2) Money and other assets received under subsection (6) or section 15(2)(l) or from any other source must be deposited in the MI home loan fund. MSHDA shall direct the investment of money in the MI home loan fund in accordance with section 22 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422, and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the MI home loan fund. (3) Money in the MI home loan fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the MI home loan fund and continues to revolve and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) MSHDA is the administrator of the MI home loan fund for audits of the MI home loan fund. (5) MSHDA shall expend money from the MI home loan fund on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Provision of financing for qualified developers under the MI home loan program. (b) Administration of the MI home loan program. (6) For the first 2 fiscal years after the effective date of this act, the legislature shall appropriate $50,000,000.00 each fiscal year for deposit into the MI home loan fund. Sec. 19. (1) The Michigan state housing development authority shall create the MI home employer program to provide grants for qualified workforce housing development projects or workforce down payment assistance. (2) MSHDA shall develop a detailed application, approval, and compliance process for the MI home employer program that is published and available on its website. The detailed application, approval, and compliance process must, at a minimum, provide for all of the following: (a) A qualified applicant may apply to MSHDA for a grant for a qualified workforce housing development project or workforce down payment assistance. (b) If the grant is for a qualified workforce housing development project, the qualified applicant must agree that the low-income housing tax credit program described in section 22b of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422b, is not being, and will not be, used as part of the financing for the qualified workforce housing development project. (c) An employer must match the amount of grant money provided on a dollar-for-dollar basis, subject to all of the following requirements: (i) An employer match may include 1 or more of the following: (A) An investment of money. (B) The value of a land or building donation. (C) A loan with a below-market interest rate. (ii) An employer match does not include either of the following: (A) Developer equity. (B) Philanthropic contributions, including, but not limited to, funding from the government, financial institutions, or community development financial institutions. (d) The application must require the applicant to provide all of the following information: (i) If the grant is for a qualified workforce development project, the standard information described in section 23. In addition, the application must be accompanied by the standard documents described in section 23. (ii) For a grant for workforce downpayment assistance, all of the following: (A) The name and address of and contact information for the qualified applicant and any program partners. If the qualified applicant or a program partner is a business entity, the qualified applicant must submit both of the following with the application: (I) A certified copy of the articles of incorporation or organization for the applicant or program partner. (II) A certificate of good standing to do business in this state, dated within 30 days of the date the application is submitted, for the applicant or program partner. (B) A description of the workforce downpayment assistance program, including, but not limited to, whether it is a new or existing program. (C) A description of all financing for the program, including, but not limited to, direct contributions, third-party financing, and any local financial support. (D) A description of the qualified applicant's capacity to implement and administer the program. Program administration may be contracted out to a qualified third party, as determined by MSHDA. (E) A description of community and local support for the project. The qualified applicant must submit evidence of community and local support with the application. (iii) A description of the employer match to be provided, including, but not limited to, the identification of the employer providing the match, the number of employees the employer employs, the type of match to be provided, and the dollar value of that match. The qualified applicant must submit documentation to verify the availability and value of the match with the application. (e) The amount of the grant must not exceed $2,000,000.00 per year. (f) An applicant may submit only 1 application per year. (g) Subject to subdivision (f), MSHDA shall award grants on a first-come, first-served basis. (h) The qualified applicant must use the grant money only for the purpose of a qualified workforce housing development project or workforce downpayment assistance. (i) If the grant is for a qualified workforce housing development project, all of the following: (i) Each dwelling unit that is part of the project must meet the requirements described in section 3b(e)(ii)(A) to (B). (ii) The qualified applicant must agree to sell or rent the qualified residential property to a qualified individual in accordance with the sale restrictions or rental restrictions, as applicable. (iii) The sale restrictions or rental restrictions must be included in the purchase agreement or lease, as applicable, and included in the property deed as deed restrictions. (iv) The grant money must not be disbursed until a written agreement under subsection (3) is executed and the sale restrictions or rental restrictions are included in the property deed as deed restrictions. (v) The purchase agreement or lease, as applicable, must include both of the following provisions: (A) A provision requiring the qualified individual to comply with the reporting requirements under this act. (B) A provision that the qualified individual will be subject to the penalties provided in section 31 if the sale restrictions or rental restrictions are violated. (j) If the grant is for workforce downpayment assistance, all of the following: (i) The qualified applicant must agree to provide the workforce downpayment assistance to a qualified individual. (ii) The grant money must not be disbursed until a written agreement under subsection (3) is executed. (k) A qualified workforce housing development project must comply with the following timeline: (i) Not later than 3 months after receipt of the grant approval letter, construction or rehabilitation must begin. MSHDA may extend this deadline if it considers it appropriate. (ii) Not later than 24 months after execution of the written agreement under subsection (3), a certificate of occupancy must be secured. MSHDA may extend this deadline if it considers it appropriate. However, if this deadline is extended, a fee equal to 1% of the amount of the grant may be imposed. (l) A qualified applicant must comply with any reporting requirements required by MSHDA. (m) A qualified applicant that violates a provision of this act is subject to the penalties provided in section 31. (n) Payments of penalties must be deposited in the MI home employer fund. (3) If MSHDA approves an application, MSHDA shall enter into a written agreement with the qualified applicant that includes the terms of the grant, including the requirements described in subsection (2). (4) In determining whether to approve financing under this section, MSHDA must consider both of the following factors: (a) The capacity of the qualified applicant to complete the project or implement and administer the program. (b) The workforce housing needs of the community and the extent to which the project or program will address those workforce housing needs. Sec. 21. (1) The MI home employer fund is created as a separate fund under the jurisdiction and control of the Michigan state housing development housing authority. (2) Money and other assets received under subsection (6) or section 19(2)(n) or from any other source must be deposited in the MI home employer fund. MSHDA shall direct the investment of money in the MI home employer fund in accordance with section 22 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422, and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the MI home employer fund. (3) Money in the MI home employer fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the MI home employer fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) MSHDA is the administrator of the MI home employer fund for audits of the MI home employer fund. (5) MSHDA shall expend money from the MI home employer fund on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Provision of grants to local units of government under the MI home employer program. (b) Administration of the MI home employer program. (6) The legislature shall appropriate $10,000,000.00 each fiscal year for deposit into the MI home employer fund. Sec. 23. (1) An applicant may not receive a grant or loan under this act if the applicant is under debarment with the federal government of the United States. (2) An applicant for a grant under the MI home grant program, financing under the MI home loan program, or a grant for a qualified development workforce housing project under the MI home employer program must provide all of, but is not limited to, the following standard information in the application: (a) The name and address of and contact information for the applicant and any development partners. (b) A description of the project, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) A description of the qualified residential property. (ii) A description of the construction or rehabilitation that is proposed for the qualified residential property. (iii) The type and number of dwelling units the finished property will provide. (c) A description of the project schedule. (d) A description of all financing for the project, including, but not limited to, capital contributions, third-party financing, and any local financial support. (e) A description of the applicant's capacity to complete the project, either with or without a development partner. (f) Whether the project is a joint venture or has a co-ownership structure. (g) A description of whether the project is compatible with the current zoning of the qualified residential property and, if the project is not compatible, a description of the steps necessary to obtain proper zoning and a timeline for completing the steps. (h) If the applicant or a development partner is a business entity, both of the following: (i) A certified copy of the articles of incorporation or organization for the applicant or development partner. (ii) A certificate of good standing to do business in this state, dated within 30 days of the date the application is submitted, for the applicant or development partner. (i) If the project is a joint venture or has a co-ownership structure, a copy of the executed joint venture or co-ownership agreement. (j) Evidence of local support. (k) Documentation that evidences the ability to maintain site control, including, but not limited to, a warranty deed, exclusive option to purchase, land contract, or similar documentation. Documentation provided under this subdivision must clearly identify the location of the property and the purchase price of each parcel. (l) A title insurance commitment dated within 6 months of the date the application is submitted. If the project is located on a federally recognized Indian reservation, an attorney's opinion letter regarding the chain of title and land control may be provided instead of a title insurance commitment. (m) Documentation from the local unit of government in which the qualified residential property is located is a designated MI home community and documentation that identifies the address of the qualified residential property included in the project, provides the current zoning designation for that property, and describes whether the proposed development is permitted under the local unit of government's zoning ordinance and, if not, the steps necessary to obtain proper zoning for the proposed development. (n) Site plan approval from the local unit of government, dated within 1 year of the date the application is submitted and, if site plan approval is granted with contingencies, an affirmation that the contingencies may be approved at the staff level. (o) Documentation from the local unit of government or 1 or more local utility companies, dated within 1 year of the date the application is submitted, regarding the availability of utilities at the site. (p) Architectural floor plans for the project. (q) If the project will receive a tax abatement, documentation from the local unit of government approving the tax abatement. (r) Documentation regarding market demand, including, but not limited to, market studies, needs assessments, and market statistics. (s) An environmental study. (t) If the project involves the rehabilitation of currently occupied dwelling units, a tenant relocation plan. (3) An applicant may receive assistance under more than 1 program under this act. (4) MSHDA may allow a combined application to be submitted by an applicant applying for assistance under more than 1 program under this act. Sec. 25. (1) A qualified individual that purchases qualified residential property through a program under this act must complete a homebuyer education class approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and receive a certificate of completion. (2) MSHDA shall make information regarding the homebuyer education class available to the public on its website. (3) A qualified developer or qualified applicant that receives a grant or loan under this act must provide information on the homebuyer education class to qualified individuals. Sec. 27. (1) A qualified developer that receives a grant under the MI home grant program or a loan under the MI home loan program must do, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Not later than 15 days after the construction or rehabilitation of the qualified residential property is complete, notify MSHDA in writing of the date of completion. (b) Not later than 15 days after the qualified residential property is sold, notify MSHDA in writing of the address of the property, the date of sale, the sales price, and the identity of the purchaser. This subdivision applies to only the initial sale of the qualified residential property. (c) Review and document the income eligibility of individuals who purchase or rent qualified residential property and make this information available to MSHDA. (d) Assist in monitoring compliance with the rental restrictions and sale restrictions. (e) Not later than March 15 of each year until the expiration of any rental restrictions or sale restrictions, submit an annual report to MSHDA that includes all of the following information: (i) The status of the construction or rehabilitation. (ii) If construction or rehabilitation has been completed, the date of completion and whether the qualified residential property has been sold or rented. (iii) If the qualified residential property has been sold, all of the following information for each dwelling unit sold: (A) The date of the initial sale. (B) The sales price. (C) The identity of the purchaser. (D) The annual household income of the purchaser at the time of purchase. (E) Whether the purchaser continues to own the property. (F) If the purchaser still owns the property, both of the following: (I) Whether the purchaser occupies the property as the purchaser's primary residence. (II) Whether the purchaser has rented any portion of the property for less than 30 days at a time. (G) If the property has been resold, for each subsequent sale, all of the following information: (I) The date of the subsequent sale. (II) The sales price. (III) The identity of the subsequent purchaser. (IV) The annual household income of the subsequent purchaser. (V) Whether the subsequent purchaser occupies or occupied the property as the subsequent purchaser's primary residence. (VI) Whether the subsequent purchaser has rented any portion of the property for less than 30 days at a time. (iv) If the qualified residential property has been rented, all of the following information for each dwelling unit rented: (A) The name of each individual who has rented the property. (B) For each individual listed under sub-subparagraph (A), all of the following information: (I) The dates the individual rented the property. (II) The annual household income of the individual. (III) The monthly rate, including any fees, charged for rent. (IV) Whether the individual occupied the property as a primary residence for the duration of the lease. (2) A qualified individual must report to the qualified developer, at the time of original purchase or lease, any information necessary for the qualified developer to prepare the report under this subsection. Sec. 31. (1) A qualified developer that receives a grant under the MI home grant program or a loan under the MI home loan program must repay money received for noncompliant units if any of the following occur: (a) The qualified developer uses the money for a purpose other than constructing or rehabilitating qualified residential property. (b) The qualified residential property is not sold or rented to a qualified individual. (c) The qualified residential property is sold or rented without the required rental restrictions or sales restrictions or the required deed restrictions. (d) The qualified developer fails to comply with the reporting requirements under this act within 90 days after notice from MSHDA that the reporting requirements have not been met. (2) A qualified applicant that receives a grant under the MI home employer program must repay money received for noncompliant units if any of the following occur: (a) The qualified applicant uses the money for a purpose other than a qualified workforce housing development project or workforce downpayment assistance. (b) If the grant is for a qualified workforce housing development project, either of the following occur: (i) The qualified residential property that is part of the qualified workforce housing development project is not sold or rented to a qualified individual. (ii) The qualified residential property is sold or rented without the required rental restrictions or sales restrictions or the required deed restrictions. (c) The qualified applicant fails to comply with the reporting requirements under this act within 90 days after notice from MSHDA that the reporting requirements have not been met. (3) If a qualified individual who purchases qualified residential property fails to comply with the sale restrictions described in section 3b(j)(ii), the qualified individual must repay the state an amount equal to the amount of money provided under this act for the qualified residential property prorated by 20% for each full year the qualified individual owned the property and occupied it as a principal residence. MSHDA may waive the penalty under this subsection if the qualified individual's failure is due to hardship, including, but not limited to, divorce, disability, illness, loss of income, or any similar hardship. (4) If a qualified individual who purchases qualified residential property fails to comply with the sale restrictions described in section 3b(j)(iii), the qualified individual may be subject to an action brought by this state under section 33. Sec. 33. The attorney general may bring a civil action to enforce any deed restrictions under this act. The action may be brought in the circuit court for the county where the qualified residential property to which the deed restrictions relate is located. Sec. 37. (1) MSHDA shall maintain a list of all qualified residential property that is currently subject to deed restrictions under this act. (2) MSHDA shall include in its annual production goals report information on the programs under this act, including, but not limited to, a summary of the information received under section 27. As used in this subsection, "annual production goals report" means the report described in section 401 of article 9 of 2025 PA 22, as required in the general appropriation act that provides funding for MSHDA for the relevant fiscal year. Sec. 39. MSHDA may utilize the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to implement this act. Sec. 41. All construction or rehabilitation for which assistance is awarded under this act must be completed according to and meet all applicable federal, state, and local construction, rehabilitation, and design standards and regulations. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04455'25) or House Bill No. 5661 (request no. H04455'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.